Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-246
Insurance statutes, applicability; sections, how construed.

All requirements, limitations, and restrictions of Chapter 44 which apply to specific lines of insurance or to companies identified by the specific lines of insurance transacted by them shall apply to such companies and to all persons or agents thereof with respect to such specific line of insurance only to the extent transacted or conducted by such companies notwithstanding the fact that companies authorized under this section are formed or authorized to transact lines of insurance included in both the life insurance and property and casualty classes of insurance. If any provisions of sections 44-242 to 44-247 conflict with any other provisions of Chapter 44, the provisions of sections 44-242 to 44-247 shall prevail.

Laws 1979, LB 332, § 5;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 90.